foma/rmc.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +NMa +NMb +NFa +NFb +V +Adj +Pron +PropNa +PropNb +Part +Adp +CConj +SConj +Det +Dem +Cop +Adv +Num +Punct +Sg +Pl +M +F +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Voc +Loc +Ins +Obl +Dist +1sg +2sg +3sg +1pl +2pl +3pl +Impf +Pst +Pfv +Imp

LEXICON Root

Noun;
Verb;
Adjective;
Pron;
ProperN;
Part;
Adp;
CConj;
SConj;
Determinant;
Cop;
Adv;
Num;
Punct;

LEXICON Noun

čhavo(chlapec):čhav NMa;
džuvli(žena):džuvl NFa;
piráni(milenka):pirán NFa;
tistkiňa(důstojnice):tistkiň NFb;
dad(otec):dad NMb;
šil(chlad):šil NMb;
faďo(mráz):faď NMa;
rom(rom/muž):rom NMb;
tisto(důstojník):tist NMa;
kabáto(kabát):kabát NMa;
háború(válka):háború NMb;
máža(váha):máž NFb;
kila(kilo):kil NFb;

LEXICON NMa

+NMa+Nom+Sg:^o   #;
+NMa+Acc+Sg:^es  #;
+NMa+Voc+Sg:^eja #;
+NMa+Nom+Pl:^e   #;
+NMa+Acc+Pl:^en  #;
+NMa+Voc+Pl:^ale #;

LEXICON NMb

+NMb+Nom+Sg:^λ #;

LEXICON NFa

+NFa+Nom+Sg:^i #;

LEXICON NFb

+NFb+Nom+Sg:^a #;

LEXICON Verb

vaker(povídat):vaker V;
dža(jít):gé V;
ulav(rozdělit):ulav V;
terď(stát):terďo V;
faďin(mrznout):faďin V;
válostin(vybrat_si):válostin V;
šajnálin(litovat):šajnálin V;
akhar(zavolat/pozvat):akhar V;
lege(vést):lege V;
thov(položit):tho V;
mírin(vážit):mírin V;
šun(slyšet):šun V;
dikh(vidět):dikh V;

LEXICON V

+V+3sg+Impf:^lahi  #;
+V+1pl+Impf:^asahi #;
+V+3pl+Prf:^le     #;
+V+3pl+Impf:^nahi  #;
+V+3sg+Pfv:^ďa     #;
+V+2sg+Imp:^λ      #;

LEXICON Adjective

baro(velký):bar Adj;
asso(takový):ass Adj;
phuro(starý):phur Adj;
ulado(rozdělený):ulad Adj;
tikno(malý):tikn Adj;
čišlo(hubený):čišl Adj;

LEXICON Adj

+Adj+Nom+Sg+M:^o #;
+Adj+Nom+Sg+F:^i #;
+Adj+Nom+Pl:^e   #;

LEXICON Pron

ó(on/ona)+Pron+Nom+Sg:ój      #;
ó(on/ona)+Pron+Nom+Pl:ón      #;
ó(on/ona)+Pron+Acc+Sg+M:le    #;
ó(on/ona)+Pron+Acc+Sg+F:la    #;
ó(on/ona)+Pron+Acc+Pl:len     #;
amen(my)+Pron+Dat+Pl:amenge   #;
odoj(tam)+Pron+Dist:odoj      #;
mr(můj)+Pron+Nom+Sg+M:mro     #;
ó(on/ona)+Pron+Loc+Sg+M:leste #;
ó(on/ona)+Pron+Loc+Sg+F:late  #;
p(sám)+Pron+Obl+Loc+Sg:peste  #;

LEXICON ProperN

Ňufo:Ňuf PropNa;
Orosko(Rusko):Orosk PropNa;
Ďusi:Ďusi PropNb;

LEXICON PropNa

+PropNa+Nom+Sg:^o   #;
+PropNa+Acc+Sg:^es  #;
+PropNa+Voc+Sg:^eja #;
+PropNa+Nom+Pl:^e   #;
+PropNa+Acc+Pl:^en  #;
+PropNa+Voc+Pl:^ale #;

LEXICON PropNb

+PropNb+Nom+Sg+M:^λ             #;
+PropNb+Obl+Gen+Nom+Sg+M:^skero #;

LEXICON Part

te(taky)+Part:te #;

LEXICON Adp

pal(o)+Adp:pal #;
uppe(nahoru)+Adp:uppe #;
andi(v/do):and IncorpArt;
ki(k/u)+Adp:ki #;

LEXICON IncorpArt

+Adp:^i #;
+Adp+Det+Nom+Sg+M:^o #;

LEXICON CConj

taj(a)+CConj:taj #;

LEXICON SConj

kana(když)+SConj:kana  #;
hoď(že)+SConj:hoď      #;
mer(protože)+SConj:mer #;

LEXICON Determinant

odá(ten/to)+Dem:odá  #;
odí(ta)+Dem:odí      #;
o:o Det;
i+Det+Nom+Sg+F:i #;

LEXICON Det

+Det+Nom+Sg+M:^λ  #;
+Det+Obl+Sg+M:^le #;

LEXICON Cop

ssa(být)+Cop+3sg+Pst:ssáhi #;
ssa(být)+Cop+3sg+Pst:ssa   #;
ssa(být)+Cop+3pl+Pst:sine  #;

LEXICON Adv

uppe(nahoru)+Adv:uppe  #;
ánde(dovnitř)+Adv:ánde #;
má(už)+Adv:má          #;
sar(jak(o))+Adv:sar    #;
ári(ven)+Adv:ári       #;
igen(velmi)+Adv:igen   #;

LEXICON Num

harminc(třicet)+Num:harminc #;

LEXICON Punct

<".+Punct":"."> #;
<"…+Punct":"…"> #;
<"…+Punct":"..."> #;
<":+Punct":":"> #;
<",+Punct":","> #;
<"!+Punct":"!"> #;
<"?+Punct":"?"> #;
<"–+Punct":"–"> #;
<"„+Punct":"„"> #;
<"“+Punct":"“"> #;
